Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1629
Bonds; approval by district court; petition; contents.

The board of trustees of the district shall, as directed in section 39-1628, file in the district court of the county in which the lands of the district, or the greater portion thereof, are situated, a petition praying in effect that the proceedings may be examined, approved, and confirmed by the court. The petition shall state the facts showing the proceedings had for issuance of the bonds, and shall state generally that the road improvement district was duly organized, and that the first board of trustees was duly elected. The petition need not state the facts showing such organization of the district or the election of the first board of trustees. A person or persons owning or desirous of purchasing such bonds when issued may bring such action, if the board shall fail to do so, or may become a party to any such action commenced by the board of trustees of such a district.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. III, § 29, p. 537.